Hawaii statutes.
[§334-104] Least restrictive level of
service. The system shall be developed in such a way that clients may move
within the system to the most appropriate, least restrictive level of service.
The system shall also allow for direct referral of clients, without requiring
that a person pass through the entire system to reach the most appropriate
level. [L 1980, c 221, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next